Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1531
Nonresident of county; illegal voting; penalty.

Except as provided in sections 32-933 to 32-937, any person who is a resident of this state and who goes or comes into any county of which he or she is not an actual resident and votes in such county shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 430.